Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 9

Administration of Private Foundations, Charitable Trusts or Split-Interest Trusts

35-9-101. Prohibited acts.

In the administration of any trust that is a “private foundation,” as defined in § 509 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 509), a “charitable trust,” as defined in § 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4947(a)(1)), or a “split-interest trust,” as defined in § 4947(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4947(a)(2)), the following acts are prohibited:

Engaging in any act of self-dealing, as defined in § 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4941(d)), that would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4941(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4941(a));

Retaining any excess business holdings (as defined in § 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 26 U.S.C. § 4943(c)), that would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4943(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4943(a));

Making any investments that would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of § 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4944), so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4944(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4944(a)); or

Making any taxable expenditures (as defined in § 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4945(d)), that would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by § 4945(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4945(a)); provided, that this section does not apply either to those split-interest trusts or to amounts of those split-interest trusts that are not subject to the prohibitions applicable to private foundations by reason of § 4947 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4947).

Acts 1971, ch. 3, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-1001.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and effect of provisions of charitable trust providing for accumulation of income. 6 A.L.R.4th 903.

35-9-102. Distribution of amounts to avoid tax liability.

In the administration of any trust that is a private foundation or that is a charitable trust, there shall be distributed, for the purposes specified in the trust instrument, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by § 4942(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4942(a)).

Acts 1971, ch. 3, § 2; T.C.A., § 35-1002.

35-9-103. Applicability of §§ 35-9-101 and 35-9-102.

Sections 35-9-101 and 35-9-102 do not apply to any trust to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the application would be contrary to the terms of the instrument governing the trust and that the same may not properly be changed to conform to those sections.

Acts 1971, ch. 3, § 3; T.C.A., § 35-1003.

35-9-104. Powers of courts and attorney general and reporter unimpaired.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the attorney general and reporter of this state with respect to any trust.

Acts 1971, ch. 3, § 4; T.C.A., § 35-1004.

35-9-105. References to Internal Revenue Code.

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (U.S.C. title 26), include future amendments to those sections and corresponding provisions of future internal revenue laws.

Acts 1971, ch. 3, § 5; T.C.A., § 35-1005.

35-9-106. Authority to amend trust for tax benefits.

It is the purpose of this section to preserve the intent of testators and grantors of testamentary and inter vivos charitable remainder trusts created prior to and after August 31, 1972, by minimizing the imposition of federal income and excise taxes, imposed upon the assets of such trusts, and thereby preserving the maximum amount of the trust assets for the charitable, educational, religious and benevolent purposes for which their remainders were intended. The attorney general and reporter shall perform such acts as, in the attorney general and reporter's opinion, will result in the effectuation of this declaration of purpose.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in the governing instrument or in any other law of this state, the trustee of any split-interest trust as defined in § 4947(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 4947(a)(2)), with the consent of all the beneficiaries under the governing instrument, may, without application to any court and either before or after the funding of the trust, amend the governing instrument to conform to §§ 170(f), 642(c)(5), 664, 2055(e), and 2522(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. §§ 170(f), 642(c)(5), 664, 2055(e), and 2522(c)), to the extent applicable, by executing a written amendment to the trust for that purpose. Consent shall not be required as to individual beneficiaries not living at the time of amendment or as to charitable beneficiaries not named or not in existence at the time of amendment. The possibility of beneficial interests arising after the amendment of the governing instruments shall not defeat the ability to amend. In the case of an individual beneficiary not competent to give consent, the consent of the beneficiary's guardian or conservator, if any, or the consent of a guardian ad litem appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be treated as the consent of the beneficiary. A copy of the proposed amendment, executed by the trustee and consented to by all beneficiaries whose consent is required under this subdivision (b)(1), shall be delivered in person or by registered mail to the attorney general and reporter. The attorney general and reporter may, within sixty (60) days after receipt of the proposed amendment, indicate by registered mail to the trustee any specific objections to the proposed amendment, in which event subdivision (b)(2) shall apply if the attorney general and reporter does not withdraw the objections. In the case of any amendment to a trust created by will or to a trust created by inter vivos instrument, unless otherwise provided, the amendment shall be deemed to apply as of the date of death of the decedent or as of the date of gift.

In the event that all of the trustees and beneficiaries under the governing instrument do not consent to the amendment, or in the event there are no named beneficiaries, any court of competent jurisdiction shall have the power to amend the governing instrument in accordance with subdivision (b)(1) upon petition of the trustee or any beneficiary and upon a subsequent finding by the court that the testator's or the grantor's intention would not be defeated by the amendment. A copy of the petition shall be delivered in person or by registered mail to the attorney general and reporter.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in the governing instrument, any devise, bequest or transfer in a testamentary or inter vivos trust for religious, educational, charitable or benevolent uses to be determined by the trustee or any other person shall be made only to organizations and for purposes within the meaning of §§ 170(c), 2055(a), and 2522(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. §§ 170(c), 2055(a), and 2522(a)).

This section also applies to executors and administrators of estates of decedents whose wills create trusts described in subdivision (b)(1).

All references to sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 refer to the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as it exists on August 31, 1972. All references to the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 in subdivisions (b)(1) and (3) refer to the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 as it exists on June 4, 1975.

This section applies in the case of all decedents dying after December 31, 1969, and in the case of all irrevocable inter vivos trusts created after July 31, 1969.

Acts 1975, ch. 329, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-1006.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Law Reviews.

Charitable Bequests: Delegating Discretion to Choose the Objects of the Testator's Beneficence (Denise Caffrey), 44 Tenn. L. Rev. 307 (1977).

35-9-107. Reformation of trusts to comply with tax regulations.

It is the purpose of this section to permit and authorize the reformation of certain inter vivos and testamentary charitable remainder trusts created prior to and after December 10, 1998, to comply with applicable federal tax regulations regarding qualifying payments to noncharitable beneficiaries. Such reformations shall be permitted and authorized upon the unanimous written consent of all living individual grantors, living individual beneficiaries, charitable remainder beneficiaries named or otherwise provided for in the trust agreement, and the trustee, with the concurrence of the attorney general and reporter. The attorney general and reporter shall perform such acts as, in the attorney general and reporter's opinion, will effectuate this declaration of purpose.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the governing instrument or in any other law of this state, the trustee of any charitable remainder trust described in § 1.664-3(a)(1)(i)(b) of the Internal Revenue Code Regulations, (26 CFR 1.664-3(a)(1)(i)(b)), as currently adopted, or as may be subsequently amended, may, without application to any court and either before or after the funding of such trust, reform the trust to meet the definition of a charitable remainder unitrust described in § 1.664-3(a)(1)(i)(c) of the Internal Revenue Code Regulations, (26 CFR 1.664-3(a)(1)(i)(c)), as currently adopted, or as may be subsequently amended. In order to effectuate this reformation, the trustee shall obtain the written consent of all living grantors, living beneficiaries, charitable beneficiaries named or otherwise provided for in the trust agreement, and the trustee, together with the written concurrence of the attorney general and reporter. If the charitable beneficiary is to be determined by a person having discretion to select or name the charitable beneficiary at the time the trust terminates, the consent of that person shall be required. Consent shall not be required as to individual beneficiaries or grantors not living at the time of reformation or as to charitable remainder beneficiaries not named or not in existence at the time of reformation.

The possibility of beneficial interests arising after the reformation of the trust instrument shall not defeat the ability to reform the trust pursuant to this section. In the case of an individual beneficiary or grantor not competent to give consent, the consent of that beneficiary's or grantor's guardian or conservator, if any, or the consent of a guardian ad litem appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be treated as the consent of the beneficiary or grantor. A copy of the proposed reformation, executed by the trustee and consented to by all living grantors, living beneficiaries, and charitable beneficiaries named or otherwise provided for in the trust agreement, shall be delivered to the attorney general and reporter. The attorney general and reporter shall, within thirty (30) days after receipt, either concur with the proposed reformation or state any specific objections to the proposed reformation in writing and delivered to the trustee by registered mail. If the attorney general and reporter state objections and those objections are not resolved to the attorney general's and reporter's satisfaction or the attorney general and reporter does not withdraw the objections, subdivision (b)(3) shall apply.

In the event that all of the living grantors, living beneficiaries, and charitable remainder beneficiaries do not consent to the reformation, any court of competent jurisdiction shall have the power to reform the governing instrument in accordance with subdivision (b)(1) upon petition by the trustee or any beneficiary. A copy of the petition shall be delivered in person or by registered mail to the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2000, ch. 600, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

35-9-108. Information or actions that cannot be required.

For the purposes of this section, “private foundation” has the same meaning ascribed to “private foundation” in § 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 509(a)), as amended.

No private foundation shall be required by a department, agency, board, or other entity of state or local government to:

Disclose the race, religion, gender, national origin, socioeconomic status, age, ethnicity, disability, marital status, or sexual orientation of:

The foundation's employees, officers, directors, trustees, or contributors, without the prior written consent of the individual or individuals in question; or

Any individual, or of the employees, officers, directors, trustees, members, or owners of any entity, that has received monetary or in-kind contributions or grants from, or contracted with, the foundation, without the prior written consent of the individual or individuals in question;

Hire, appoint, or elect an individual of any particular race, religion, gender, national origin, socioeconomic status, age, ethnicity, disability, marital status, or sexual orientation as an employee, officer, director, or trustee of the foundation;

Disqualify, remove, or prohibit service of an individual as an officer, director, or trustee of the foundation based upon such individual's familial relationship to other officers, directors, or trustees of the foundation or a contributor to the foundation;

Hire, appoint, or elect an individual as an officer, director, or trustee of the foundation who does not share a familial relationship with the other officers, directors, or trustees of the foundation or with a contributor to the foundation; or

Except as a lawful condition or requirement on the expenditure of particular funds imposed by the contributor or grantor of such funds, distribute the foundation's funds to, or contract with, any individual or entity based upon the:

Race, religion, gender, national origin, socioeconomic status, age, ethnicity, disability, marital status, or sexual orientation of the individual or of the employees, officers, directors, trustees, members, or owners of the entity; or

Populations, locales, or communities served by the individual or entity.

Acts 2013, ch. 193, § 1.